affixes/prefixes.lexc
!! Prefixes
!  --------
!! Prefixes in the Lushootseed language are bound to beginning of other words.

LEXICON Prefixes
Prefixes_01 ;
@U.TAM-SUBJ.SUBJ@:@U.TAM-SUBJ.SUBJ@gʷə%< Prefixes_01 ; !sbj = subjunctive
@U.TAM-HAB.IRR@:@U.TAM-HAB.IRR@ɬu%< Prefixes_01 ; ! qəlb 'rain': ɬuqəlb 'rain in the future' is this a noun, too? _intention to_

LEXICON Prefixes_01
Prefixes_01a ;
@U.TAM-RE.RE@:@U.TAM-RE.RE@bə%< Prefixes_01a ;

LEXICON Prefixes_01a
Prefixes_01b ;
@U.TAM-HAB.HAB@:@U.TAM-HAB.HAB@ƛ̕u%< Prefixes_01b ;

LEXICON Prefixes_01b
Prefixes_01c ;
@U.PossPx.Sg1@:@U.PossPx.Sg1@d%<     Prefixes_01c   ;
@U.PossPx.Sg2@:@U.PossPx.Sg2@ad%<    Prefixes_01c   ;
 DVNouns_01 ;

LEXICON Prefixes_01c
 Nouns ;
! These are the first Northern Lushootseed
 N_NEWWORDS ;
 DVNouns   ;

!Lonsdale 2001:211-212
!ɬubələskʷaxʷyildutəxʷčəɬ
!ɬu<bə<ləs<kʷaxʷ>y>il>d>ut>əxʷ>čəɬ
!Fut+ANEW+PgrSttv+help+YI+il+Trx+Rfx+Inc+our


LEXICON DVNouns
@U.NMZ.V2N@:@U.NMZ.V2N@s%< DVNouns_01 ; !Need to mark this with flags 2021-06-30
@U.NMZ.V2A@:@U.NMZ.V2A@dəxʷ%< DVNouns_01 ; !
 DVNouns_01 ; !
 
!ƛ̕u=bə= Hab+Add
!bə%<ƛ̕u%< Add+Hab
!ƛ̕u=s=ʔəs Hab+Nmz+Stat

!gʷə%<ƛ̕u%<ʔas– Sbj+Hab+Stat
!ƛ̕u%<ʔas– Hab+Stat
!ƛ̕u%<ʔu%< Hab+Pfv
!gʷə%<tu%< Sbj+Rem
!ƛ̕u%<tu%<lə%< Hab+Rem+Prog
!ƛ̕u%<0%<lə%< Hab+Prog
!ɬu=d=s=ʔaʔ Irr+PxSg1+Nmlz+be.there

LEXICON DVNouns_01
@U.TAM-T.REM@:@U.TAM-T.REM@tu%< DVNouns_02 ; !remote past, any predicate
DVNouns_02 ;

LEXICON DVNouns_02
@U.TAM.NO@:@U.TAM.NO@ Verbs ; 
!verbprefix-     Verbs   ;
 VERBS_OR_NOUNS ;
@U.TAM-A.PROG@:@U.TAM-A.PROG@lə%< VERBS_OR_NOUNS ;!non-circumscribed, progressive
@U.TAM-A.STAT@:@U.TAM-A.STAT@ʔəs%< VERBS_OR_NOUNS ; !ongoing state
@U.TAM-A.STAT@:@U.TAM-A.STAT@ʔas%< VERBS_OR_NOUNS ; !ongoing state
@U.TAM-A.PROGSTAT@:@U.TAM-A.PROGSTAT@ləs%< VERBS_OR_NOUNS ;
@U.TAM-A.PFV@:@U.TAM-A.PFV@ʔu%< VERBS_OR_NOUNS ; ! qəlb 'rain': ʔuqəlb 'raining' doesn't sound perfect to me

!ʔəsq̓iʔq̓aƛ̕əb _partly cloudy_ ɬasq̓iʔq̓aƛ̕əb __partly cloudy in the future__
!ʔəsgiʔgəqəb __partly sunny__ ɬasgiʔgəqəb __partly sunny in the future__
!ʔiɬgəqil __mostly sunny__ ɬasʔiɬgəqil __mostly sunny in the future__
!ʔəsgəqəb __sunny__ ɬasgəqil __sunny in the future__
!

LEXICON VERBS_OR_NOUNS
Verbs ;
 N_NEWWORDS ;
 Nouns ;
 Adjectives ;
 
! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
